Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3224.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-64.10 of the General Laws entitled "Quonset Development
Corporation" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-64.10-16. Prohibition on thermal waste conversion facilities.
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule, regulation, or authority to the
contrary, the Quonset development corporation shall not authorize, permit, lease, approve, or
otherwise allow the siting, operation or construction of any thermal waste conversion facility, or
similar chemical or thermal processes designed to convert solid waste, plastics, biomass, or other
feedstock into fuels, energy, or chemical products, within the boundaries of the Quonset
Point/Davisville Industrial Park.
(b) For the purpose of this section, “thermal waste conversion facility” means any facility
utilizing elevated temperatures in a controlled or oxygen-limited environment to chemically
decompose or transform solid waste or sewage sludge materials into gaseous, liquid, or solid
products intended for energy generation, fuel production, or industrial use.
(c) The provisions of this section shall apply to all real property owned, managed, leased,
or otherwise under the jurisdiction of the Quonset development corporation.
(d) Nothing contained herein shall be construed to impair the right of any individual or
entity who lawfully engaged in any activity provided in subsection (a) of this section prior to the
effective date of this section.

(e) This section shall expire and have no force or effect as of June 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006352/SUB A
========
LC006352/SUB A - Page 2 of 3